Nebraska, session 109, LB767.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB767 LB767
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Certified Help Options in Claims Expertise for Veterans Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Certified Help Options in Claims
Expertise for Veterans Act:
(1) Compensation means any money, thing of value, or economic
benefit conferred on, or received by, any person in return for services
rendered, or to be rendered, by such person or any other person;
(2) Veterans benefits matter means the preparation, presentation, or
prosecution of any claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed
an intent to file a claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity,
function, status, or entitlement for which veterans, their dependents,
their survivors, or any other individuals are eligible under the laws and
regulations administered by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, the United States Department of Defense, or the Nebraska
Department of Veterans' Affairs pertaining to veterans, their dependents
or survivors, or any other individuals eligible for such benefit,
program, service, commodity, function, status, or entitlement; and
(3)(a) Person means any natural person, corporation, trust,
partnership, incorporated or unincorporated association, or any other
legal entity.
(b) Person does not include:
(i) An agent, attorney, or other representative accredited or
regulated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(ii) A state or county veterans service officer.
Sec. 3. (1) No person may act as a veteran's agent or attorney with
respect to a veterans benefit matter unless such individual has been
recognized for such purposes by the Secretary of Veterans Affairs of the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
(2) Except as permitted under state or federal law, no person shall
receive compensation, directly or indirectly, for referring any
individual to another person to prepare, present, or prosecute any
-2-

LB767 LB767
2026 2026
veterans benefits matter before the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, the United States Department of Defense, or the Nebraska
Department of Veterans' Affairs or to advise, consult, or provide
assistance regarding any such matter.
(3) Unless a veteran signs a waiver acknowledging that the veteran
is choosing to forego free services available to such veteran, a person
shall not receive compensation for any services rendered in connection
with any claim in a veterans benefits matter that is filed within the
one-year presumptive period of active duty release; or
(4)(a) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising,
assisting, or consulting with any individual in connection with any
veterans benefits matter shall, before rendering any services,
memorialize the specific terms under which the amount to be paid will be
determined in a written agreement signed by both parties.
(b) Compensation for such services shall be purely contingent upon
an increase in benefits awarded, and if successful, compensation shall
not exceed five times the amount of the monthly increase in benefits
awarded based on the claim.
(c) Such person shall not charge any initial or nonrefundable fee.
(d) Such person shall not charge interest on any payment plans
agreed to by the parties.
(e) If the amount owed for compensation in conformance with this
section exceeds the amount of any past-due benefits awarded to the
claimant, such person:
(i) Shall not require the claimant to pay such total amount in a
single payment; and
(ii) Shall provide the claimant with an option to pay such total
amount in incremental payments not to exceed the amount of the monthly
increase of benefits awarded to a claimant pursuant to the claim
associated with such fee agreement.
Sec. 4. A person seeking to receive compensation for advising,
-3-

LB767 LB767
2026 2026
assisting, or consulting with any individual in connection with any
veterans benefits matter shall not guarantee, either directly or by
implication, a successful outcome or that any individual is certain to
receive specific benefits or a specific level, percentage, or amount of
benefits.
Sec. 5. (1) Any person advising, assisting, or consulting on
veterans benefits matters for compensation shall provide the following
disclosure at the outset of the business relationship: "This business is
not sponsored by, or affiliated with, the United States Department of
Defense, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Nebraska
Department of Veterans' Affairs, or any other federally chartered
veterans service organization. The Nebraska Department of Veterans'
Affairs and other organizations, including local veterans service
organizations and other federally chartered veterans service
organizations, may be able to provide you with this service free of
charge. Products or services offered by this business are not necessarily
endorsed by any of these organizations. You may qualify for other
veterans benefits beyond the benefits for which you are receiving
services here."
(2) The written disclosure shall appear in at least twelve-point
font in an easily identifiable place in the person's agreement with the
individual seeking services.
(3) The written disclosure agreement shall contain an acknowledgment
that the individual understands its provisions and the individual shall
sign such acknowledgment.
(4) The person offering services shall retain a copy of the written
disclosure while providing veterans benefits services for compensation to
the individual and for at least one year after the date on which the
service relationship terminates.
Sec. 6. A person advising, assisting, or consulting on veterans
benefits matters for a fee shall:
-4-

LB767 LB767
2026 2026
(1) Not utilize international data centers for processing a client's
personal information;
(2) Not gain direct access to any login, username, or password
information for a client's personal medical or financial data or accounts
or the client's government benefits;
(3) Ensure that any individual who will have access to a client's
medical or financial information undergoes a background check prior to
gaining such access. Such background check shall be conducted by a
reputable source and shall include identity verification and a check of
criminal history record information; and
(4) Maintain a certification from the National Association for
Veterans Rights or an accreditation from the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs.
Sec. 7. A violation of the Certified Help Options in Claims
Expertise for Veterans Act shall constitute a deceptive trade practice
under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act and shall be subject to
any remedies or penalties available for a violation of such act.
Sec. 8. Nothing in the Certified Help Options in Claims Expertise
for Veterans Act shall be construed to:
(1) Prohibit a division of fees between attorneys that is otherwise
proper under Nebraska law and the Nebraska Rules of Professional Conduct;
(2) Apply to, limit, or expand the requirements imposed on agents,
attorneys, or other representatives accredited or regulated by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(3) Apply to state and county veterans service officers.
-5-